dictionaries/tlh-Latn/index.aff
# Author: Pander <pander@users.sourceforge.net>
# License: Apache License 2.0
# Homepage: https://github.com/PanderMusubi/klingon
# Version: 1.0.9
# Date: 2022-05-08 07:52:45
# Source: build from boQwI' version 2.0
SET UTF-8
TRY a'ohIenlutgHrmqSDjpbwyvcQ
WORDCHARS abceghjlmnopqrtuvwy'DHIQS’
ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm|qawsedrftgyhujikolp|azsxdcfvgbhnjmk|aze|qsd|lm|wx|aqz|qws
SFX E Y 1
SFX E 0 Du' .
SFX L Y 1
SFX L 0 mey .
SFX N Y 25
SFX N 0 'a' .
SFX N 0 'e' .
SFX N 0 DIch .
SFX N 0 Daj .
SFX N 0 Daq .
SFX N 0 Hey .
SFX N 0 Hom .
SFX N 0 chaj .
SFX N 0 lI' .
SFX N 0 lIj .
SFX N 0 logh .
SFX N 0 ma' .
SFX N 0 maj .
SFX N 0 mo' .
SFX N 0 na' .
SFX N 0 oy .
SFX N 0 qoq .
SFX N 0 ra' .
SFX N 0 raj .
SFX N 0 vaD .
SFX N 0 vam .
SFX N 0 vetlh .
SFX N 0 vo' .
SFX N 0 wI' .
SFX N 0 wIj .
SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0 pu' .
SFX V Y 38
SFX V 0 'a' .
SFX V 0 'egh .
SFX V 0 DI' .
SFX V 0 Ha' .
SFX V 0 Qo' .
SFX V 0 ba' .
SFX V 0 be' .
SFX V 0 beH .
SFX V 0 bej .
SFX V 0 bogh .
SFX V 0 choH .
SFX V 0 chu' .
SFX V 0 chugh .
SFX V 0 chuq .
SFX V 0 ghach .
SFX V 0 jaj .
SFX V 0 lI' .
SFX V 0 la' .
SFX V 0 laH .
SFX V 0 law' .
SFX V 0 lu' .
SFX V 0 luH .
SFX V 0 meH .
SFX V 0 mo' .
SFX V 0 moH .
SFX V 0 nIS .
SFX V 0 neS .
SFX V 0 pa' .
SFX V 0 pu' .
SFX V 0 qa' .
SFX V 0 qang .
SFX V 0 qu' .
SFX V 0 rup .
SFX V 0 ta' .
SFX V 0 taH .
SFX V 0 vIS .
SFX V 0 vIp .
SFX V 0 wI' .
PFX v Y 28
PFX v 0 DI .
PFX v 0 Da .
PFX v 0 Du .
PFX v 0 HI .
PFX v 0 Sa .
PFX v 0 Su .
PFX v 0 bI .
PFX v 0 bo .
PFX v 0 che .
PFX v 0 cho .
PFX v 0 gho .
PFX v 0 jI .
PFX v 0 ju .
PFX v 0 lI .
PFX v 0 lu .
PFX v 0 ma .
PFX v 0 mu .
PFX v 0 nI .
PFX v 0 nu .
PFX v 0 pI .
PFX v 0 pe .
PFX v 0 qa .
PFX v 0 re .
PFX v 0 tI .
PFX v 0 tu .
PFX v 0 vI .
PFX v 0 wI .
PFX v 0 yI .
