dictionaries/tlh-Latn/index.dic
'I'/NO
'ImSIng/N
'InDIye'na'/NL
'InDIyene'palIS/NL
'InSep/NO
'Ing/vV
'Inglan/NL
'Iptay/NE
'IqnaH/N
'IrneH/NE
'IrneHnal/NE
'Italya'/NL
'IvtIH/NO
'Iw puj/N
'a'ghen/NE
'a'leghen'I'/NL
'aD/NOvV
'aDHom/NO
'aQlo'/NO
'aSralya'/NL
'aSya'/NL
'ab/vV
'achler/NO
'aj/NE
'alghuQ/NE
'alnum/NO
'amerI'qa' 'ev chan 'ev/NL
'amerI'qa' SepjIjQa'/NL
'amerI'qa' tIng chan tIng/NL
'amrI'/N
'anDo'ra'/NL
'anDor/NL
'anDorngan/NE
'anDorya'/NL
'anDorya'ngan/NE
'antartIq/NL
'ap/NvV
'aq/vV
'aqaD/NL
'arHentInya'/NL
'arab Hol/N
'atlantIq bIQ'a'/NL
'avghanIStan/NL
'avrI'qa'/NL
'avwI'/NE
'ayItI/NL
'e'levan/N
'e'mam/NE
'e'mamnal/NE
'e'nal/NE
'eQway/NO
'eS/vV
'eSpanya'/NL
'eStIy/NL
'ebHIv/N
'ech/NE
'ejyo' ra'ghomquv/N
'elaDya'/NL
'elaS/NL
'emrIgh/NE
'enDeq/NO
'enteD/N
'eqwaDor/NL
'ev/NvVL
'ewro/N
'ewrop/NL
'eyawaDIy/NL
'eyre'/NL
'oDwI'/NE
'oH/N
'oSHeQ/NO
'oStIn/NL
'oSteray'/NL
'oSwI'/NE
'och mutlhwI'/NE
'ol/vV
'onteryo/NL
'op ret/N
'oray/NL
'orayngan/NE
'orayya'/NL
'orayya'ngan/NE
'orghen/NL
'orghengan/NE
'orghenya'/NL
'orghenya'ngan/NE
'orwI'/NE
'otHa'/vV
'otlhtej/NE
'ovwI'/NE
'oynot/NO
'u'/N
'uS/NO
'uj'IllI'/N
'ul pat mutlhwI'/NE
'uluS/NL
'um/vV
'unwat/N
'urwI'/NE
'utbe'/vV
'utlh/NE
DI/N
DISjaj/N
DIjwI'/NE
DIr/NO
DIr bID/N
DIreS'en/NL
DItroy'/NL
DIv/vV
Da'/NE
DaH/N
DaQ/NO
Dam/vV
Dap bom/N
Daqturaq/NE
DawI'/NE
Day/N
DaynguH/NO
De'wI' SoSbor'a'/N
DeS/NO
DeSqIv/NO
Degh/NvV
DeghwI'/NE
DenIb/NL
DenIb Qatlh/N
DenIbngan/NE
DenIbya'/NL
DenIbya'ngan/NE
Denmargh/NL
DevwI'/NE
Do qaD/N
Do'Ha'/vV
Do'ghI'/NO
Dojmey/N
Don/vV
Doy'yuS/NL
DoyIchlan/NL
Du'ran/NO
DuH/vVN
Dub/NOvV
DughrI'/NO
Dup/N
Dut/vV
Duy/NE
Duy'a'/NE
HI'/NE
HI''a'/NE
HIjmeH 'ap/N
HIjmeH 'ap pIn/NE
HIl'egh/vV
Ha'on/N
HaS/vV
Hajvav/N
Hamburgh/NL
Han/vV
Hanghuq/NL
Haptej/NE
Haqtaj/N
HaqwI'/NE
Hay'/vV
Hech/vV
Heghba'/N
Hergh ngevwI'/NE
Hev/vV
Ho'/vVNO
Ho' 'etlh/N
HoD/NE
HoS voveng/NO
HoSghaj/vV
Holtej/NE
Hom/NOvV
HomHap tun/NO
HomwI'/NO
Hot/vV
Hov lat/N
Hovtay'/NL
HuD/NO
HuD beQ yoS/NL
HuDqIj/NL
HuDyuQ/NL
Hugh/NO
Huj/vV
Human/NE
Hung buv rav/N
Hur'Iqngan/NE
HutDIch/N
Hutvav/NO
Hutvav rarwI'/NO
Huy/vV
Huy'/NO
Huy'Dung/NO
QI'tomer/NL
QI'yoS wa'/NL
QISmaS/N
QIStaq/NL
QImHal/NO
QIn tum/N
QIp/vV
Qach/vV
Qagh/NvV
Qatlh/NvV
Qay'mol/N
Qay'wI'/NO
QeDpIn/NE
Qenno'/N
Qep/vV
Qo'noS/NL
QoD/vV
QoghIj/NO
Qol/vV
Qorwagh/N
Qot/vV
Qotmagh Sep/NL
Quch/vVNO
QujmeH moQ/N
Qun/NE
Qutlh/vV
Quvar/N
SIQwI'/NE
SIlovenISqa'/NL
SIm/vV
SIpoq/N
SIqenDInavya'/NL
SIqotlan/NL
SIqral/NL
SIqral bIQtIq/NL
SIqwI'/NO
Sa'/NE
Sa'Hut/NO
Sa'Qej Sep/NL
SaHa'ra'/NL
SaQatvelo'/NL
SaS/vVN
SanmIr/N
Saq/vV
SaqSub/NL
Sarbruqen/NL
Saturn/NL
Say'moHmeH DoQmIv'a'/N
SeD/vV
SeS ghItwI'/N
Sen/vVNL
SenwI'/NO
Sep/NLvV
SepjIjQa'/NL
Seq/N
SeymoH/vV
So'chIm/NE
SoSnI'/NE
Sogh/NE
Sol/vVNL
SolDeS/N
Somraw/NO
Sop/vV
Sorya'/NL
Sotlhqel/N
Soy'/vV
Su'nIm/NO
Sum/vV
Sung/NE
Sup/vVN
SurIna'ma/NL
Surya'/NL
Suto'vo'qor/NL
Sutra'ber naH/N
Suverya'/NL
SuvwI'/NE
SuwISya'/NL
SuwomIy/NL
bI'/vV
bIHnuch/N
bIQ'a'/NL
bIQtIq/NL
bIrI'tIS qolambIya/NL
bIraSIw/NL
bIreQtagh/N
ba'/vV
baHwI'/NE
baStan/NL
baghneQ/N
balgharya'/NL
bam/vV
barat/NL
batqul/N
bay'eS/NE
be'Hom/NE
be'nal/NE
be'taSeD/NL
beQ/vVN
begh/N
belghIya'/NL
bem/NO
beq/NE
ber/vV
berlIn/NL
bertlham taymey/N
bo/NO
bo'DIj nompuq/N
bo'retlh/NL
boD/NO
boSporoS/NL
bobcho'/N
bochmoHwI'/NE
bogh/vV
bomwI'/NE
boqHa'/vV
bortaS/N
buSHa'/vV
bulvar/NE
burgh/NO
butlh/N
chI/vV
chI'ID/NO
chItlh/vV
cha'/vVNL
cha'DIch/NE
cha'bIp/N
cha'neH/NO
chab/N
chaltoq loS/NL
chamwI'/NE
chan/N
chap/NO
chav/vVN
chayqa'/NO
cheSqa'/NL
chej/NO
chelwI'/NE
chen/vV
chevwI' tlhoy'/N
choH/vVN
choSan/NL
choghvat pa'/N
chor/NO
chorgh/NvVL
chot/vV
chotwI'/NE
chuD/N
chum/vVN
chut qeSwI'/NE
chuv/vVN
ghID/vV
ghISDen/NO
ghIch/NO
ghIn/N
ghIpDIj/vV
ghIt/NOvV
ghItlhwI'/NE
ghItwI'/N
ghIv/NO
ghaj/vV
gham/NO
ghanjaq/N
ghapqa'/NO
gharwI'/NE
ghaw/vV
ghe''or/NL
ghe'naQ/N
ghe'tor/NL
ghenlan/NL
gher/vV
ghevchoq Sep/NL
ghew/N
gho'rIch/NO
ghoch/NvV
ghochwI'/N
ghojmoHwI'/NE
ghol/NE
ghomey/N
ghop/NO
ghor/vVN
ghor'In/NE
ghotI''a'/N
ghu/NE
ghuj/vV
ghuwan/NL
jIb/NOvV
jIl/NE
jInay'/NL
jIrmoHwI'/N
jIvvo'/NE
jIy/vV
jab/vV
jagh/NE
jajlo'/N
jantor/NE
jargh/NO
jat/NOvV
jatlhHa'/vV
jatyIn/N
jegh/vV
jem'IH/N
jergh/vV
jey'naS ghoqwI'/NE
joH/NE
joQ/NO
joch/vV
jonSeH yaH/N
jonpIn/NE
jor/vV
jorja/NL
ju'pIter/NL
juHqo'/N
jubbe'/vV
jungwoq/NL
jup/NE
lIHtentay'/NL
lIQ/vV
lIbya'/NL
lIghon/NL
lIghonngan/NE
lIn/vV
lIwnal/NE
la''a'/NE
la'SIv/N
la'pa' loS/NL
laS/vV
lagh/NEvV
lanDan/NL
lang/NvV
laqlaq/N
le'/vV
leS/NvV
lem/NO
leng/NvV
lenmeS rop/N
letSeburgh/NL
lev/NOvV
ley'/NO
loDHom/NE
loDmach/NO
loDnal/NE
loH/vVN
loch/NOvV
logh/N
logh Hop Hut tengchaH/NL
logh'ob/NO
lolchu'taH/vV
lopno'/N
lorbe'/NE
lotlhwI'/NE
loy/vV
luH/vVNO
lulaQlu'bogh/N
lum/vV
lur/NO
lut/N
mI'wI'/NE
mIHneS/N
mIQ/vVNO
mIgh/vV
mIjDang/NO
mIn/NO
mIn tojwI'/N
mInyoD/NO
mIw/N
mIyama/NL
maS/NvV
maS'e' loQ So'be'bogh QIb/N
maSIr/NL
maghrIb/NL
majyang mutlhwI'/NE
malja'/N
mangHom/NE
mangtay/NL
maqoch/NE
martaq/N
marwI'/NO
mavje'/NO
maw/vVN
may'Duj/N
me'/NE
meHghem Qat/N
meb/NE
mej'aD/NO
melchoQ/NO
men/vV
mep vol/N
meqro'vaq Sep/NL
moQbID/N
moS/vV
moch/NE
mong/NO
mongghol 'uluS/NL
moq/vV
mov/NO
mu'neqo/NL
muSHa'/vV
much jech/N
muchwI'/NE
mup/vV
muvtay/N
muylIS/NO
nI'/vV
nIHwI'/NE
nIm tlhagh/N
nIpon/NL
nIt/NvV
nItlh/NO
nItlh Su'nIm/NO
nItlhpach/NO
nIwqen/NO
naH tlhab/N
nab/vVN
nach/NO
namwech/NO
nanwI'/NO
nav qatwI'/N
naw'/vVN
nayeghra/NL
ne'Derlan/NL
neb/NO
nen/NvV
neqratlh/N
nev'ob/NO
nevroD/NO
ngIb/NO
ngIn/vV
ngaDmoH/vV
ngagh/vV
ngan/NE
nge'/vV
ngeSlIch 'ap/N
ngech/NO
ngep/vV
ngob'at/NO
ngogh mutlhwI'/NE
ngol/vV
ngu'/vV
nguHwI'/N
nguy/vV
no''och/NO
no'tej/NE
nobmeD/NO
noghmanDIy/NL
non/vV
noq/NO
norgh/N
nortlham/NE
nu'SIylan/NL
nuHpIn/NE
nuQ/vV
nughtej/NE
nuj/NO
nuv/NE
nuyorgh/NL
pID/vV
pIlam naH/N
pIm/vV
pIn'a'/NE
pIp/NO
pIra'Ha/NL
pItlhbergh/NL
pa' beb/N
pa'vo/NL
pa'vongan/NE
pach/NO
pan/vV
parmaq/N
parmaqqay/NE
paw/vV
paw'aD/NO
pe'ru'/NL
pej/vV
pentatlh wej/NL
per/NvV
po'lISqa'/NL
poH/NvV
pob/NO
pon/vV
porghtej/NE
pu'/NO
pu'veng/NO
pujmoH/vV
puq/NE
puqloD/NE
puqnI'be'/NE
puv/vV
qIl/vV
qInlat/NL
qItoy/NE
qIv/NO
qIvon/NO
qa'meH/N
qa'naDa'/NL
qaDwI'/NE
qaS/vV
qab/vVNO
qalIvornIya/NL
qam/NO
qama'/NE
qamerun/NL
qanwI'/NO
qap/vV
qarDaS/NL
qarDaSngan/NE
qaw/vVN
qawHa'/vV
qayrI'Hom/NO
qaytu'/NE
qaywI'/NO
qeb/vV
qebeq/NL
qelpIngan/NE
qempa'/NE
qenSaS/NL
qerjIq/N
qet/vV
qevpob/NO
qewwI'/NO
qey'Hav/NO
qo'rIDan/NL
qoH/NE
qoch/NEvV
qogh/NO
qonwI'/NE
qop/vV
qovDa'/N
qu'rIl wa'/NL
qub/vVN
qul SuvwI'/NE
qul qaDwI'/NE
qum DuSaQ/N
qumwI'/NE
qup/NE
qurbuSwI'/NE
qurmoQ/NO
qutlh/vV
rI'wI'/N
rIQmoH/vV
rIlwI'/NO
rIn/vV
rItwI'/NE
rIymuS/NL
raQ/NvV
raQpo'/NE
raSya'/NL
rajma'/NO
raq/vV
rarwI'/NO
raytej/NE
reStav/NO
regh/vV
reghuluS chorgh/NL
rejghun/N
rem'ay'/NO
renwI'/NE
repnuj/NO
ro/NO
ro'/NO
roDSon/NO
roS/vV
roSqa'QeD/N
roSqa'tej/NE
roSwI'/NO
rol/NO
romanI'ya'/NL
rorgh/vV
ruDelya'/NL
ruS/NvV
rubyo'/NE
run/vV
rura' pente'/NL
tI'wI'/NE
tIb/vV
tIng/NL
tIq/NvVO
tIv/vV
tab/vV
tagh/NOvV
tajvajHom/N
talarngan/NE
taq/vV
taq'ev Sep/NL
tawI'yan/NE
tay/NvVE
tay'ghoqor/NL
taymoH/vV
teS/NO
tebwI'/NE
tel/NO
tel'em/NE
telun Hovtay'/NL
telya'/NO
tennuS/NE
teqSaS/NL
tera' bIQ lung'a'/N
tera'ngan/NE
tey/vV
tey'be'/NE
tlhIlwI'/NE
tlhIng yoS/NL
tlhIv/vV
tlhap/vV
tlhay'moHwI'/NE
tlheD/vV
tlheH/N
tlhepwI'/NO
tlhob/vV
tlhon/NO
tlhorghHa'/vV
tlhuQ/NO
tlhum/NvV
to'baj/N
to'waQ/NO
toch/NO
togh/vV
totlh/NE
toy'wI''a'/NE
tu'/vV
tu'HomI'raH/N
tuS/vV
tun/NOvV
tuqvol/NO
tur/vV
turIqya'/NL
turmIq 'enDeq/NO
vI'Ir/N
vIQ/vV
vIlHom/NO
vIlle'/NE
vInDa'/NE
vIraS/NL
vItlh/vV
va'nuch/NO
vagh reD mey'/N
valQav/NO
vanDIroS/NL
var/vV
vav/NE
vavoy/NE
veD/NO
veS/N
vech/vV
veghaS/NL
velwI'/NE
veng/NL
veng wa'DIch Sep/NL
verengan/NE
voDchuch/N
voSpegh Sep/NL
volchaH/NO
vonlu'/vV
voveng/NO
vu'wI'/NE
vulqangan/NE
vut/vV
vutwI'/NE
wIgh/NE
wIjwI' jan/N
wIlle'/NO
wa'/NL
wa'SIngtanDIySIy/NL
wab ta/N
wamwI'/NE
wanHa'/vV
wej/NL
wev/NvV
wo' tay'/NL
woS/NO
wuS/NO
wun/vV
yISra'el/NL
yInroH/N
yIrIDngan/NE
yaD/NOE
yaD pach/NO
yaS cha'DIch/NE
yab/NO
yaj/vV
yanwI'/NE
yay SubmaH/N
yeb/NO
yeru'Sala'yIm/NL
yon/vV
yoq/NE
yoq yIn yuQ/N
yotwI'/NE
yuQjIjDIvI'/NL
yur/NE
